District of Columbia statutes.
2-209.02

Reciprocal police mutual aid agreements — Required provisions.

The District of Columbia shall not enter into any such agreement unless the agreement provides that each of the parties to such agreement shall:

(1)

Waive any and all claims against all the other parties thereto which may arise out of their activities outside their respective jurisdictions under such agreement;

(2)

Indemnify and save harmless the other parties to such agreement from all claims by third parties for property damage or personal injury which may arise out of the activities of the other parties to such agreement outside their respective jurisdictions under such agreement.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1150, Pub. L. 90-587, § 2
1981 Ed., § 1-1126.
1973 Ed., § 1-821.